Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-8] Contribution among and recovery
from multiple defendants. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
part II of chapter 663 shall apply to a cause of action established by this
chapter. [L 2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next